Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1147
Powers of department; construction of act.

Nothing in the Nebraska Chemigation Act shall be construed to limit the powers of the department provided in Chapter 81, article 15.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 47.